Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 33
DAMAGES TO EMPLOYEES

Section

40-33-101. Damages for injury of employee.

Every common carrier by railroad in the state of Colorado shall be liable in damages to any person suffering injury while he is employed by such carrier in or about the transporting or handling of any freight, property, passengers, engine, locomotive, or other vehicle upon the tracks of such carrier, or in case of the death of such employee, to his personal representative for the benefit of the surviving widow, or husband, children, parents, or dependents of such employee, for such injury or death resulting in whole or in part from the negligence of any of the officers, agents, or employees of such employer, or by reason of any defect or insufficiency due to the employer's negligence.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 512, § 1.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(1).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-1.

40-33-102. Contributory negligence no bar.

In all actions brought against any such common carrier under or by virtue of any of the provisions of this article to recover damages for personal injury to the employee, or where such injuries have resulted in his death, the fact that the employee may have been guilty of contributory negligence shall not bar a recovery, but the damages shall be diminished by the jury in proportion to the amount of negligence attributable to such employee; but no such employee who may be injured or killed shall be held to have been guilty of contributory negligence in any case where the violation by such employer of any state or federal statute enacted for the safety of employees contributed to the injury or death of such employee.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 513, § 2.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(2).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-2.

40-33-103. Employee does not assume risks.

In any action brought against any common carrier under or by virtue of any of the provisions of this article to recover damages for injuries to, or the death of, any of its employees, such employee shall not be held to have assumed the risks of his employment in any case where such injury or death resulted in whole or in part from the negligence of any of the officers, agents, or employees of such carrier, or by reason of any defect or insufficiency, due to its negligence, in its cars, engines, appliances, machinery, track, roadbed, works, boats, wharves, or other equipment.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 513, § 3.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(3).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-3.

40-33-104. Jury question.

In any action brought against any such common carrier under or by virtue of any of the provisions of this article, to recover damages for injury to, or the death of, any of its employees, the question as to whether the negligence or violation of law claimed to have caused or contributed to the injury or death of such employee did in substance cause or contribute to such injury or death, and the question as to whether such negligence or violation of law was the proximate cause of such injury or death shall, in all cases, be for the determination of the jury.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 513, § 4.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(4).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-4.

40-33-105. Presumptive evidence.

In all actions brought against any such common carrier under or by virtue of any of the provisions of this article to recover damages for personal injury to the employee, or where such injuries have resulted in his death, the fact of any such injury or death occurring to such employee and arising out of and in the course of his employment shall be presumptive evidence of the want of reasonable skill and care on the part of such carrier and its agents, servants, and employees in reference to such injury or death unless and until rebutted.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 514, § 5.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(5).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-5.

40-33-106. Attempts to exempt carrier from liability void.

Any contract, rule, regulation, or stratagem whatsoever, the purpose or intent of which is to enable any common carrier to exempt itself from any liability created by this article, shall to that extent be void; but in any action brought against any such common carrier under or by virtue of any of the provisions of this article, such carrier may set off therein any sum it has contributed or paid to any insurance, relief benefit, or indemnity that may have been paid to the injured employee, or the person entitled thereto on account of the injury or death for which said action was brought.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 514, § 6.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(6).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-6.

40-33-107. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Common carrier" includes the receiver or other persons or corporations charged with the duty of management and operation of the business of a common carrier.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 514, § 7.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(7).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-7.

40-33-108. Right of action survives.

Any right of action given by this article, to a person suffering injury shall survive to his personal representative, for the benefit of the surviving widow or husband and children of such employee, and, if none, then of such employee's parents; and, if none, then of the next of kin dependent upon such employee, but in such cases there shall be only one recovery for the same injury.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 514, § 8.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(8).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-8.

40-33-109. Right of action limited.

No action shall be maintained under this article, unless commenced within the time period prescribed in section 13-80-102, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 515, § 9.

CSA:

C. 139, § 87(9).

CRS 53:

§ 116-14-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-14-9.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 19, effective July 1.